California, session 20252026, AB598.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Article 5.4 (commencing with Section 32293) is added to Chapter 2.5 of Part 19 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code, to read: Article 5.4. School Mapping Data Grant Program Act32293. This article shall be known, and may be cited, as the School Mapping Data Grant Program Act.32293.1. As used in this article, the following definitions apply:(a) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.(b) “Grant program” means the School Mapping Data Grant Program established pursuant to Section 32293.2.(c) “Public safety agency” means a local, state, or federal agency that provides emergency public safety services to participating schools.(d) “School mapping data” or “data” means information provided to assist public safety agencies in efficiently responding to on-campus emergencies at participating schools.(e) “School” means a school maintained by a local educational agency.32293.2. (a) (1)It is the intent of the Legislature that the grant funding provided pursuant to this article is used to establish a single and verified source of school mapping data, for each participating school, that is standardized, accurate, and accessible to public safety agencies for purposes of ensuring efficient responses to on-campus emergencies at the school.(2)(b) The School Mapping Data Grant Program is hereby established under the administration of the Office of Emergency Services. The Office of Emergency Services shall provide one-time grants to participating local educational agencies to enter into contracts with qualified vendors providing school mapping data.(3)(c) (1) The Office of Emergency Services Services, in consultation with the State 9-1-1 Advisory Board, shall determine the data requirements of a school mapping data program that is eligible to receive grant funding under the grant program. The data requirements shall include, but not be limited to, both of the following:(A) The school mapping data program shall include the same program parameters as a web-based or app-based school safety program encouraged by Section 32280.5.(B) The school mapping data program developers shall implement the same best practices to protect the security and data of all pupils and staff as a web-based or app-based school safety program encouraged by Section 32280.5.(2)  Paragraphs (1) and (2) of, and subparagraph (B) of paragraph (6) of, subdivision (a) of Section 32280.5, contain sensitive and tactical response information that is critical to the safety and well-being of public schools and their pupils. Therefore, the information in paragraphs (1) and (2) of, and subparagraph (B) of paragraph (6) of, subdivision (a) of Section 32280.5 shall be kept confidential, except as otherwise required for purposes of implementing this section, and shall be exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).(b)(d) A local educational agency that receives grant funding under the grant program shall select, in collaboration with local public safety agencies, including, but not limited to, those providing law enforcement, firefighting, or other emergency services, a school mapping data program that meets the criteria established by the Office of Emergency Services pursuant to paragraph (3) (1) of subdivision (a), and that meets the needs of public safety agencies and participating schools. (c).32293.3. (a) The Office of Emergency Services may expend up to 5 percent of any appropriation made for purposes of this article on its administrative costs to implement and administer the grant program.(b) This article shall only be implemented upon an appropriation by the Legislature for its purposes in the annual Budget Act or another statute.SEC. 2. The Legislature finds and declares that Section 1 of this act, which adds Section 32293.2 to the Education Code, imposes a limitation on the public’s right of access to the meetings of public bodies or the writings of public officials and agencies within the meaning of Section 3 of Article I of the California Constitution. Pursuant to that constitutional provision, the Legislature makes the following findings to demonstrate the interest protected by this limitation and the need for protecting that interest:In order to protect sensitive and tactical response information that is critical to the safety and well-being of public schools and their pupils, it is necessary that the information described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of, and subparagraph (B) of paragraph (6) of, subdivision (a) of Section 32280.5 of the Education Code, which is incorporated by reference in Section 1 of this act, be kept confidential.